District of Columbia statutes.
47-2105

Continuation of sale beyond termination date prohibited; extension of termination date; continuation of business at new location prohibited.

No person shall conduct a closing-out sale or a sale of goods, wares, or merchandise damaged by fire, smoke, water, or otherwise beyond the termination date specified for such sale, except that an extension may be authorized upon proper showing of need; nor shall any person, upon conclusion of such sale, continue that business which had been represented as closing out or going out of business under the same name, or under a different name, at the same location, or elsewhere in the District of Columbia where the inventory for such sale was filed; nor shall any person, upon conclusion of such sale, continue business contrary to the designation of such sale.

Sept. 1, 1959, 73 Stat. 450, Pub. L. 86-219, § 5
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
This section is referenced in § 47-2109.
1981 Ed., § 47-2105.
1973 Ed., § 47-3005.